ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/pl_PL/hyph_pl_PL.dic
e1wł
ei2
e1ir
e1in
e1i1b
e1id
e1is
e1iz
e1il
e1it
e1ic
e1ić1
e1i1g
e1b
ebo3w
e2b2s
eb2m
ebu1
e2da2w1k
e1da
e1dr2
e3do
edo1b
ed2nio
ed1n
ed1ni
ed1w2o
edw2
e1db
e1de
e1dl
e1du1ż
e1dą
ed1ło
ed1łó
e1d2ż
e2dź1
e1sw
e1si
e1sz2e
es2z
e1szl
e1szu
esz3czo
es2zc
esz3cz2e
e2sz1ki
es2zk
e1sz2p
e1szó
e1sta
e1str2
e3s2t1s
e1stę
e1su
e1s2c
e1sh
e1są
e1sy
e1sk
e1sp
e3spó
e3sf
e1sł
e1za
eza2u1
ezro1
ezo2w
e1zn
ez2wi
e2z1br
ezb2
e3z1da
e2zd
e1z2e
ezer3w
e2z1c
e1z2ą
e1zy
e2z1k
e1zę
e1zł
ee2
e1er
e1ed
e1es
e1et
e1e2k.
e1e1kl2
e1ep
e1e1g
e1la
e1lo
e1li
e1lu
e1lą
e1lę
e1ló
e1l2ga
el1g
e1l2g2i.
e1ma
em1r
e1mo
em3n
e1mi
e1mu
e1my
e1m2ś
e1mę
e1mó
e1tra
etr2
e1tro
e1trw
e1trza
e1trz2e
e1trzu
e1tru
e1to
e1tw
e1te
e1tl
e1tu
et1ka
e2tk2
e1tę
e1tó
e1tł
eu1r
e1u2n
e1uw
e1ub
eu2d
e1u2s
eu2s2z1k
eus2z
e1uz
eu1lu
eu1ma
eu1tr2
e1uc
e2u1ci
e1uk
e1up
eu2g
e1uż
e1ci
e4c2z.
e1czo
e1cz2e
e1czu
e1czy
e1czę
e1czó
e1cho
e2ch1n
e1chwa
ec2hw
ech1wi
e1che
e1chl
e1ch2c
e1chy
e1ch2ż
e1ja
e1jo
e1ję
e1h
e2h1r
ehi1
e1ka
e1kr2
e2k1n
e1ki
ek1si
e1ks2z
1eks3c
ek1e
e1kl2
e1ku
e1ką
e1kó
e1kł
e1św
e1śm
e1pa
e1pr
e1po
e1pi
ep1s2z
e2ps
e1pe
e1pla
ep2l
e1ple
e2p1t
e1pu
e1pą
e1py
e1pę
e1pó
e1pł2
eć1m
e1ó
e1fa
e1fo
e1fi
e1fu
e1ła
e1ło
e1łe
e1łu
e1łą
e1ły
e1łę
e1ży
e1vi
e1ve
eź1w
e1ź2le
eź1l
2l.
la1s2c
la1sy
lau1
la1ka
lo1b
lo1d
lo1si
lo1st
lo1sk
1lo1z
1lol
lo1mó
lo1ta
lo1tr2
lo1cz2e
lo1k
lo1p
1loń1
2l1n
2l1w
li1de
li1st
li1s2k
liz2
li1zn
li1zb2
li1zmu
lizm2
li1mi
1liu
1lip
l1b
2ld
l1dr2
l1do
l1de
l1du
2l1s2
ls2z1c
ls2z
3l2sen
l1se
l1z
le1o2
le1we
le1dw2
le1dy3
ledys2
1les
les2z1c
les2z
le1st
le1z
le1l
le1me
le1ta
le1tr2
le1tą
le1ty
le1ko
1leś
1lef
1leż
l1la
l1li
l3l1s2
l1le
l1lu
l1ly
l1lę
2l1m
l1t
ltu1
lu1r
lu1w
lu1i2
lu1bo
lu1bi
lu1be
lu1do
lu1sz2e
lus2z
lu1st
lu1za
lu1zy
lu1l
lum3ni
lu2mn
lu1mi
lu1ta
lu1ja
lu1ka
lu1kr2
2l1c
l1j
l1h
ly2o2
2l1k
l2kl2
lk1lo
lku1
lkud2
l2ś
l1p
l1f
l2g2n
l1g
l2g2i.
l2gą
l2gę
l2ż
2m.
ma1dr2
mas2z1c
mas2z
ma1s2c
ma1tr2
ma1ka
ma1kl2
ma4g3d
ma1g
m1ra
m1rot
mo1b
mo1d
mo2d1n
mo1si
mo1sta
mo1sk
mo1z2
mo1ta
mo1czo
mo1cz2e
mo1czy
mo1ch
mo1ka
mo1kr2
mo2k3n
mo1kł
mo1p
m1na
m2naż
m2ni
m3nić1
m1w
1m2i.
mi1ra
mi1ro
mi1re
1mii
1mi1s
mi1zme
mizm2
mi1zmu
mi1lo
mi1lu1
1mi1ś
2m1b
ms2z1c
ms2z
m1su
m1s2c
m1sk
me1rz
1men
1me1d
1mes
me1z
me1le
me1t
me1c
1mej
1mek
m1li
m1m
m1t
mu1ra
mu1ro
mu1rz
mu1ru
mu1s
mu1z
mu1lo
mu1li
mu1le
mu1mi
mu1ta
mu2t1k2
mu1c
mu1k
mu1ł
2m1c
m1h
1mą1
mk2
m1ka
m1ko
m1ki
m1ku
m1ką
m1kó
m2ś
mę1s2
2m1p
1mór
m1f
m2g
m1ży
2t.
ta1dł
1ta1z
ta1tr2
ta1ka
ta1f
ta1v
tr2
2t2r.
tro3l
2t2r2z.
2t2rz1n
toa3
to1b
to1si
to1st
to1sk
tom3n
to1mó
to1ta
to1cz
to1ch
to1ka
to1kr2
to1kl2
to1pa
to1po
to1pi
to1pu
to1pó
1tof
2t1n
t2nij
t1ni
t3ne
2t2w.
t2w1c
ti1ra
1tis
1tiz
t1b
2t1s
3t2s1m
te1rz
1ter1m
teo3l
te1st
te1zi
te1le
1te1ma
1te1mo
1te1mi
1te1me
1te1my
1te1mó
1tet
te1ta
te1ty
te1ko
2t2l.
2t2l1n
2t1m
2t1t
t3ta
tu1ra
tu1ro
tu1rz
tu1rą
tu1w
tu1b
tu1do
tu1de
tu1si
tu1lo
tu1li
tu1le
tu1lu
tu1lą
tu1ta
t2u1ci
tu1cz2e
tu1k
tu1p
tu1ł
t1ci
t1cz
tch2
2t2h.
1tha
1ty1ne
1tyn1g
1tys
1ty1z2
1tyś
tygo1
ty1g
2tk2
t1k2a.
t1kar
t2kał
t1ko
3t2kn
t1ki
t1ku
t1ką
t1kó
t1p
2tór
tó1rz
2t1f
1tła
tło1
1tły
u1a2
uro1c
ur1wa
urwi1
u1rza
u2r1zas
u1rzo
u1rzu
u1rzy
u1re
u1ry
u1rę
u1ró
u1o2
u1na
unies2z3
u1ni
unies2
un2s
u1ną
u1nę
u1we
u1wę
ui2
u1iz
u1ic
u1i1g
u1bl
ub1lo1k
u1bu
u1bą
u1bę
u3d2a.
u1da
ud3nic
ud1n
ud1ni
ud3nik
u1d2w2
u1dl
u1dą
u1dł
u1d2ż
u2sz1n
us2z
u2s2zc
u2s2zk
us1tec
u1s1tek
u1sty
u2s2c
u1sha
u1są
u1zo
u1zi
u2z2d
uz3dy
u1z2e
u1z2j
u1zę
u1zó
u1e2
u1la
u1lę
u1m2a.
u1man
u1maj
1umr
u2mn
um1ną
um1nę
u1me
u1mu
u2mk2
u1to
u1ti
u1te
u1tu
u1tą
u1ty
u1tó
u1u2
2uci
u2c2z2t
u1czó
u2ch1n
u1che
u1chl
u1chła
u1jo
u1ji
u1ję
u1ki
u1ke
u1ku
upo1
upor2
upo2d
u1pu
u1pą
u1py
u1pę
uć1
u1fr
u1fi
u1fe
u3ge1
u1g
u1łe
u1łą
u1ły
u1łę
u1ży.
u1żym
u1v
2c.
1ca
ca1ka
1cr
1co
co1ba
co1s
co1k
c1n
cio1d2
ci1st
ci1sko
cis2k
ci1sku
ci1z2
1cip
2c2z.
1cza
1czo1w
1czo2t.
1czo1ty
1czok
2cz1n
cz1b2
1cz2e.
cz2e
czes2z1
1czem
1czej
cz1l
2cz1m2
2c2zt
cz1tó
1czu.
2c2zc
1cz2ą
1czy1z2
1czy1k
1czyź
2c2z1k
1czów
1ce
ce1d
ce1st
ce1z
ce1le
ce1ta
ce1ty
ce1c
ce1f
2c1l
2c2m
c3mi
2c1t
1cu
cu1r
cu1b
cu1d
cu1s
cu1m
cu1cho
cu1k
2c1c
1c2j
2c2h.
1cha
1chrza
c2hr
chrz2
1chrzó
2chn
1chi
1che1a2
1chel
1chu
3chą
1chy.
1chę
1chó
1cą
1cy
2c1k
c2k1n
c3ki
c2ks
1cę
c1p
1có
1cł
2j.
ja1d2
1jak
ja1ka
2j1a2k1t
1jaś
ja1f
j1r
jo1b
2jod
2jos
jo1z
j1n
j1w
j3ws
j3wc
j1is
jil1
j1b
j1d
jdo1
j1s
jsu1
j1z
j3zd
1je
je1rz
je1st
je1zi
je1zu
je1t
je1c
2jef
j1l
j1m2
j1t
j2tc
j2t1k2
1ju
ju1ro
ju1b
ju1d
ju1sz2e
jus2z
ju1szu
ju1st
ju1li
ju1le
ju1t
2j1c
j1j
j1h
1ją
j1k
j1św
j1śm
j1p
jpo4w
jpo2w1s
1jó
j1f
j1ł
j1ż
2h.
ha1me
ha1k
ha1f
2hr
hrz2
hor1w
h1obe
h2o1de
ho1st
ho1ta
ho1cz
ho1ch
ho1pa
ho1pi
ho1f
h1o2g
h1na
h3ne
h1nąc
2hw
h1wid
h3ws
h1we
hia1
hi1r
hi1wi1
hi1st
hi1ch
h1d
h1s
he1rz
he1o
he1st
he1le
h1l2e.
h1ma
h1mo
h1mia
h1ta
h1tu
h1tą
h1ty
hu1ra
hu1rz
hu1b
hu1de
hu1ste
hu1li
hu1m
h2u1ci
h2c
h3cic
h3cz
h1k
h1św
ąw1
ą1w2o
ą1w2ó
ą1ba
ą1bi
ą1be
ą1bą
ą1by
ą1bę
ą1dr2
ą1do
ą1de
ą1dl
ą1du
ą1dą
ą1dł
ą1s
ą2st
ą3ste
ą2sł
ą1za
ą1zo
ą1z2e
ą1zu
ą1zy
ą2z1k
ą1zł
ą1ta
ą1to
ą1twa
ą1twą
ą1twy
ą1twę
ą1te
ą1tu
ą1tą
ą1ty
ą2t1k2
ą1tó
ą1tł
ąc1om
ą1co
ą1ci
ą1czo
ą1cz2e
ą1czy
ą1ch
ą1ka
ą1ko
ą2k1n
ą1ki
ą1kl2
ą1kó
ą1p
ą2p1s
ą1łe
ą1ży
ya2
y1an
y1as
y1am
y1ak
y1r
yr2w
y1o2
yoz2
y2ot
y1na
yn2s
y1nu1
y1ną
y1nę
y1wa
y1wr
y1w2o
y1wi
y2w1s
y1we
y1wu
y2w1c
y1wą
y1wy
y2w1k
y1wę
y1w2ó
y1wł
yi2
y1im
y1ic
y1b
y3br2
y1d
ydo1
y2d1n
yd2ni
yd2w2
yd2m
y1sw
y1si
ysią2cu
y3s2s
y1sz2e
ys2z
y1szl
y2s2z1t
y2s2z1c
ys1l
y1sm
y1st
y3sta
ys1try
ystr2
y3sto
y3stó
y1su
ys1h
y1sy
ys1kr2
ys1kw
y1sł
y1z2
y3zd
yzu1
y2z3k
y2zł
y1e2
y1l
y1ma
y1mr
y1mo
ym3ni
y1mi
ym1s
y1me
y1mu
y1my
y1m2kn
ymk2
y1mę
y1mó
y1t
yt1ka
y2tk2
y1u
y1ci
y1czo
y1cz2e
y1czy
y1czę
y1c2hr
y1cho
y1chl
y1chy
y1chł
y1ja
y1jo
y1ję
y1h
y1k
y2k1n
y1św
y1śm
y1p
yp1ty
y2pt
y1ćm
y1f
ygod2
y1g
y1ła
y1ło
y1ł2bi
ył1b
y1łe
y1łu
y1łą
y1ły
y1łę
y1łó
y1ż2si
yż1s
y1ży
2k.
1ka1i2
ka1d
ka1sp
ka1me
1kat
ka1tu1
kau1k2
ka1k
1kaś
ka4p1s
ka1p
kapu1
kr2
kro1c
ko1rę
ko2w1r
ko1w
ko1b
ko1d
ko1si
ko1str2
1koz
ko1zn
ko2z1d
ko1zł
ko1ta
ko1tr2
ko1tw
ko1c
ko1p
ko1f
2kn
k2nu
1kw2o
kwi1s
1kwe
ki1ra
ki1s
ki1lo
2ki1co
2ki1cu
k1b
2k2s.
k1sie
k2s2zc
ks2z
k1stam
k1stac
ks1tr2
k1sto
k1sty
k1su
ks3c
k1sy
ks1k
ks1p
k1s2pi
k2s1f
ke1t
kl2
2k2l.
1kl2i.
1kliz2
3klu1
2km
k1me
2k1t
1k2tór
ku1ra
ku1ro
ku1ri
ku1w
ku1i2
ku1b
ku1s
ku1z
ku1lo
ku1li
ku1le
ku1lu
ku1lą
ku1ta
ku2t1k2
ku1tę
k2u1ci
ku1ja
ku1k
ku1śm
ku1p
ku1ła
ku1łu
ku1łó
2k1c
k1h
k1k
k1ś
1kę1
kó1rz
kó1łe
2k1f
2k2ł.
1kłe
1kły
2k1ż
2ś.
1ś2n
ś1ba
ś1bą
ś1by
ś1bę
1ś2l
2ś2l.
2ś2l1n
2ś2l1m
1śmy
ś1t
1śc
ś1k
1śp
2ść1
3śćm
ś1ż
ę1w
ę1ba
ę1bo1
ę1bi
ę1be
ę1bl
ę1by
ę1bó
ę1dr2
ę1do
ę1d2z
ę3dza
ę3dzy
ę1de
ę1dl
ę1du
ę1dą
ę1dł
ę2dź1
ęs2
ę1si
ę1sta
ę1sto
ę1ste
ę1stą
ę1sty
ę1s2c
ę1są
ę1sy
ę1sk
ę1sł
ę1z
ę1l
ę1ta
ę1trza
ętr2
ę1trz2e
ę1trzu
ę1to
ę1tw
ę1te
ę1tl
ę1tu
ę1tą
ę1ty
ę2t1k2
ę1tę
ę1tó
ę1c
ę1ka
ę1ko
ę2k1n
ę1ki
ęk1s
ę1kl2
ę1ku
ę1ką
ę1kó
ę1kł
ę1ś
ę1pa
ę1po
ę1pi
ę2p1s
ę1pe
ę1p2l
ę1pu
ę1py
ę1pó
ęć1
ę1ł
ę1ży
2p.
1paw
pa1dw2
pas2z1
pa1m
pa1t
pa1ka
1pa1g
2p2r.
2pro1b
pros2z3c
pros2z
pro1k
2p2r2z.
przy1w2
pru1
po1rw
po1rę
po3o2
po3w
po4w1n
po1b
po1dra
podr2
po1dró
p2o1de
po2dem
po2dek
pod1l
po2du.
po1du
po2d1ó
po2d1ł
po3dź
po1s
po3s2z2
po3z2
po3l2n
po3l2k
po1m
po3t
po4t.
po4t1t
po2t2k2
po1c
po3c2z2c
po1h
po1k
po1ś
po3p
po4p1k
po3ł
2p1n
pi1r
1pii
pi1st
pi1s2k
pie1t
pi1lo
1pik
1pić1
2ps
3psu
psy1
p1sk
1p2e.
1pei2
1ped
1pel
pe1le
1pem
pe1ta
pe1tr2
pe1ti
pe1ty
pe1c
1pej
pe1p
p2l
1pli
plą1
1plę
2p1m
2pt
p1to
p1te
p1tu
p1tą
p1tę
p1tó
pu1ra
pu1ro
pu1rz
pu1d
pu1si
pus2z1
pu1sta
pu1ste
pu1stą
pu1le
pu1t
pu1k
pu1ła
pu1łó
2pc
p1ci
p1cz
3pch2
1ph
2p2h.
py1c
2p1k
2p1p2
p3ps
1pów
pół1
2p1f
pł2
1ćw
ć1b
ć1d
ć1s
1ćma
ć1u
ć1c
ć1k
ó1ra
ó1ro
ó1rza
ó1rz2e
ó1rzu
ó1rzy
ó1re
ó1ru
ó1rą
ó1ry
ó1rę
ó1ró
ó1wi
ó2w1s
ó1we
ó2w1c
ó2w1k
ó1ba
ó1bo
ó1bi
ó1be
ó1bl
ó1bu
ó1bą
ó1by
ó1bę
ó2d
ód1zi
ó1dz
ó3de
ós2
ó1s2z
ó1st
ó1z2e
ó2z1k
ó1z2g
ó1la
ó1lo
ó1li
ó1le
ó1lu
ó1ló
ó1to
ó1te
ó1tl
ó1tu
ó1ty
ó2t1k2
ó1tó
ó1c
ó2cz
ó3cz2ą
ó3czę
ó2ch
ój2r
ó2k1n
ó1ki
óć1
ó2g
ółu2
ó1ły
ó1łó
óż2d
ó1ży
2f.
fa1s2c
fa1me
fo1b
f1n
fi1ra
fi1re
fi1st
fi1s2k
1fil
fi1lo
fi1lu1
1fit
fe1rz
fe1s
fe1z
fe1le
1fem
fe1ta
fe1tą
fe1ko
1f2l
flo1
fu1ra
fu1ro
fu1ri
fu1tr2
1fuj
fu1k
fu1ł
f1c
1fą
1fy1
f1k
1fę
1fó
2f1f
f2g
1g
2g.
ga1cz
grz2
go1rę
go1b
go1dł
go1si
go1st
go1z
go1ta
go1tr2
g2o2u2
go1c
go1p
g2n
g1ne1
gwi1s
gi1d
gi1s
gi4p1s
2gb
g1be
gbu1
2g2d
g3do
3g1dz
3g1dy
2g1z
geo1r
geo3l
ge1s
ge1ta
ge1ti
ge1ty
2gm
g1mar
g1man
g1me
g1mu
2g1t
gu1ra
gu1ro
gu1ru
gu1b
gu1s
gu1z
gu1l
gu1m
gu1ta
gu1ła
gą2s2z
gą1s
2g1k
2g1p
gó1rz
gó1ł
2g1g
2g2ł.
głu1s
ń1
2ł.
ła1s2c
ł1au
ła1ka
ł1r
ło1b
ł2o1de
ło1s
ło2s2z1c
łos2z
łom3n
ło1ta
ło1tr2
ło1tw
ło1ka
ło1ks
ło1pa
ło1po
ło1pi
2ł1n
ł1w
łw2o1
ł1i
ł1b
2ł1d
2ł1s
2ł1z2
ł1l
ł1m
2ł1t
łu1w
łu1b
łud2
łu1m
łu2m3n
łu1c
łu1k
łu1pa
łu1po1
łu1pi
łu1pe
łu1ł
łu1ży
2ł1c
ły1s
2ł1k2
ł2kał
3ł2kn
łku1
ł1p
ł1f
2ł1g
łgo1
2ł1ł
ł1ż
1xa
xo1
2ż.
1ża
żat1
ża1ka
żró3
1żo
ż1n
1żw
ż1b
ż1d
żd4ży
żd2ż
ż1s
1że
że1ta
że1ty
ż1l
ż1my
1żu
żu1ro
żu1ru
żu1s
żu1m
żu1c
ż1c
1żą
ży1sk
1ży1l
ż1k
1żę1
2ż1p
1żó
2ż1g
vi1de
1źr
źro1
źró3
ź1n
ź1w2o
ź1wy
ź1ba
ź1bi
ź1by
ź1bę
ź1l
ź1m
ź1c
